Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3612
Notice to city or village; contents.

At such time as the county board determines that it is prepared to proceed with orders for the development of the sewerage disposal system and plant or plants proposed in the resolution under section 23-3605, it shall formally give notice to the city or village, within whose area of future growth and development the sewerage disposal system and plant or plants will be located, of its intent to proceed. In the event that the sewerage disposal system and plant or plants project will be located within the area of future growth and development of more than one city or village, the county shall give notice to that city or village within whose area more than fifty percent of the sewerage disposal system and plant or plants, as determined by linear measure, will be located. With the notice the county shall provide the city or village with copies of all relevant documents and information regarding the sewerage disposal system and plant or plants and the plans for its development, including any estimates of cost and proposed plans for financing the project.

Laws 1994, LB 1139, § 12.